Arkansas, session 2025, HB1964.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 16-87-216 is repealed.
16-87-216. Juvenile Ombudsman Division — Definitions.
(a) For purposes of this section, the following definitions shall
apply:
(1) “Best interests of the juvenile” includes those actions and
courses of action which:
(A) Keep the juvenile safe from physical, mental, or
sexual abuse while in state custody;
(B) Are considerate of the court's recommendations and
*LJH061*
04/01/2025 3:00:22 PM LJH061

HB1964
adhere to the juvenile's treatment plan; and
(C) Work toward rehabilitating the juvenile;
(2) “Division” means the Division of Youth Services of the
Department of Human Services;
(3) “Executive director” means the Executive Director of the
Arkansas Public Defender Commission; and
(4) “Juvenile” means any juvenile who has been committed to the
custody of the Division of Youth Services pursuant to a disposition order of
the juvenile division of circuit court.
(b)(1) It is the intent of the General Assembly to create a Juvenile
Ombudsman Division of the Arkansas Public Defender Commission to provide for
independent oversight of the Division of Youth Services' facilities and
programs that are unlicensed or unaccredited.
(2) There shall be created within the Arkansas Public Defender
Commission a juvenile ombudsman and assistant juvenile ombudsmen that shall
be appointed by the executive director.
(3) The minimum qualifications for an ombudsman shall be as
follows:
(A) A master's degree in:
(i) Social work;
(ii) Psychology;
(iii) Law; or
(iv) A related field;
(B) A bachelor's degree in:
(i) Social work;
(ii) Psychology; or
(iii) A related field; or
(C) Four (4) years' direct experience in programs serving
juvenile offenders and their families.
(4) No waiver of the minimum qualifications in subdivision
(b)(3) of this section shall be permitted.
(c) The powers and duties of the ombudsman shall be as follows:
(1) The ombudsman shall be given online access to all tracking
systems maintained by the Division of Youth Services, including but not
limited to the:
(A) Incident report tracking system and the disposition of
04/01/2025 3:00:22 PM LJH061

HB1964
incidents reported therein;
(B) Parent helpline tracking system; and
(C) Juvenile tracking system;
(2) The ombudsman may attend scheduled meetings or reviews of
juvenile intake, program progress, or aftercare planning;
(3) The ombudsman shall be given access to any meeting or
document that would be accessible to the general public through the Freedom
of Information Act of 1967, § 25-19-101 et seq.;
(4) The ombudsman shall be given reasonable prior notice of all
major activities of the Audit and Compliance Section of the Division of Youth
Services and shall be permitted to accompany the monitor or monitoring team
of the Division of Youth Services on any monitoring visit or audit;
(5) The ombudsman shall be subject to the same compliance with
all procedures, policies, and laws regarding the confidentiality of juveniles
committed to the Division of Youth Services as required by Division of Youth
Services employees;
(6) The ombudsman may initiate and maintain contact with any
juvenile during the juvenile's custodial placement or while on aftercare
status;
(7) The ombudsman shall be given access to the juveniles and to
the juveniles' records and meetings of program progress and case planning at
all the privately contracted facilities of the Division of Youth Services;
(8)(A) To identify instances where necessary services are not
being provided with respect to the safety, health, education, and
rehabilitation of the juvenile as identified in a treatment plan.
(B) When a problem is identified, the ombudsman shall
notify the Director of the Division of Youth Services or his or her designee,
the juvenile court having jurisdiction, the juvenile's parents or guardian,
and the juvenile's attorney or attorneys of the problem;
(9) To document a juvenile's questions, complaints, and concerns
related to the juvenile's health, safety, education, and treatment and seek
answers to those questions and address the complaints and concerns in an
expedient manner;
(10) To request and review, as needed, all records on the
history and treatment of the juvenile while in the custody of the Division of
Youth Services or in aftercare, including related agency and court records;
04/01/2025 3:00:22 PM LJH061

HB1964
(11) To make unannounced visits to the unlicensed or
unaccredited facilities of the Division of Youth Services, whether state-run
or privately operated, to assure the safety and well-being of the juveniles;
(12) Upon receipt of a complaint involving alleged child
maltreatment, the ombudsman shall immediately report the alleged incident to
the Child Abuse Hotline, the facility director, and the Director of the
Division of Youth Services or his or her designee, who shall be responsible
for ensuring the juvenile's safety;
(13)(A) To prepare annual reports on the overall
functioning of the Division of Youth Services' ability to provide for the
safety, health, education, and rehabilitation of juveniles committed to the
Division of Youth Services.
(B) The report shall be submitted to:
(i) The Secretary of the Department of Human
Services and the Director of the Division of Youth Services;
(ii) The House Committee on Aging, Children and
Youth, Legislative and Military Affairs;
(iii) The Senate Interim Committee on Children and
Youth;
(iv) The judges of the juvenile divisions of circuit
court; and
(v) The Governor;
(14) To prepare annual reports comparing the court's
recommendations, the treatment plans of the Division of Youth Services, and
the actual services provided; and
(15) The audit and compliance process of the Division of Youth
Services to verify that each juvenile has unhampered access to a grievance
process that addresses the juvenile's questions, complaints, and concerns in
a timely manner in accordance with policy and procedure of the Division of
Youth Services or applicable statute.
(d) The ombudsman shall have no authority to command or otherwise
instruct any Division of Youth Services employee or contracted agent of the
Division of Youth Services regarding any aspect of programming or operations,
nor may the ombudsman alter or countermand any instruction to, or
participation by, juveniles that is consistent with the policy and procedure
of the Division of Youth Services or otherwise part of the treatment plan,
04/01/2025 3:00:22 PM LJH061

HB1964
program, or operations associated with the agency.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 20-82-211 is repealed.
20-82-211. Child Welfare Ombudsman Division — Creation — Powers and
duties.
(a)(1) There is created within the Arkansas Child Abuse/Rape/Domestic
Violence Commission the Child Welfare Ombudsman Division.
(2) The Executive Director of the Arkansas Child
Abuse/Rape/Domestic Violence Commission shall:
(A) Hire a Child Welfare Ombudsman; and
(B) Supervise the Child Welfare Ombudsman.
(3) The Child Welfare Ombudsman shall not be supervised by the
members of the Arkansas Child Abuse/Rape/Domestic Violence Commission.
(4) The minimum qualifications for the Child Welfare Ombudsman
shall include:
(A) A master's degree in:
(i) Social work;
(ii) Psychology; or
(iii) A related field; or
(B) Comparable experience in one (1) or more programs that
serve juveniles and families who are involved in dependency-neglect
proceedings.
(5) The Child Welfare Ombudsman shall have the following powers
and duties:
(A) The duty to work independently of the:
(i) Department of Human Services;
(ii) Administrative Office of the Courts;
(iii) Commission for Parent Counsel;
(iv) Attorney Ad Litem Program;
(v) Arkansas Public Defender Commission; and
(vi) Arkansas Court Appointed Special Advocates
program;
(B) The duty to communicate with a:
(i) Juvenile after the approval of, and subject to
the conditions set by, the:
(a) Dependency-neglect attorney ad litem
04/01/2025 3:00:22 PM LJH061

HB1964
appointed to the juvenile; or
(b) Attorney for the juvenile if the juvenile
has an attorney other than a dependency-neglect attorney ad litem; and
(ii) Parent of a juvenile after the approval of, and
subject to the conditions set by, the attorney for the parent if the parent
has an attorney;
(C) The authority to access a record as allowed by law;
(D) The duty to review and recommend necessary changes to
procedures under the Arkansas Juvenile Code of 1989, § 9-27-301 et seq., the
Child Maltreatment Act, § 12-18-101 et seq., and other laws relevant to the
operation of the child welfare system that are applicable to the:
(i) Department of Human Services;
(ii) Division of Arkansas State Police;
(iii) Administrative Office of the Courts;
(iv) Attorney Ad Litem Program;
(v) Commission for Parent Counsel;
(vi) Arkansas Public Defender Commission; and
(vii) Arkansas Court Appointed Special Advocates
program;
(E) The duty to review an issue or concern related to a
court case or investigation of a juvenile if it appears that the juvenile,
parent of the juvenile, foster parent of the juvenile, relative of the
juvenile, or fictive kin of the juvenile may need assistance from the child
welfare ombudsman;
(F) The duty to provide training and technical assistance
if a request is received from:
(i) A member of the child welfare system;
(ii) The General Assembly; or
(iii) The office of the Governor;
(G) The duty to make the public aware of the Child Welfare
Ombudsman Division and the contact information for the Child Welfare
Ombudsman Division; and
(H)(i) The duty to prepare an annual report concerning
the work of the Child Welfare Ombudsman Division, the operation of the child
welfare system, and any recommendations related to the operation of the child
welfare system.
04/01/2025 3:00:22 PM LJH061

HB1964
(ii) The Child Welfare Ombudsman Division shall
submit the annual report to the:
(a) Governor;
(b) Secretary of the Department of Human
Services;
(c) Director of the Division of Arkansas State
Police;
(d) Director of the Division of Children and
Family Services;
(e) Director of the Administrative Office of
the Courts;
(f) Commission for Parent Counsel;
(g) House Committee on Aging, Children and
Youth, Legislative and Military Affairs; and
(h) Senate Interim Committee on Children and
Youth.
(iii) The annual report shall not contain
information that would identify a juvenile or the family of a juvenile.
(b) As used in this section, “juvenile” means a juvenile as defined in
§ 9-27-303 who is:
(1) A respondent in a dependency-neglect proceeding held under
the Arkansas Juvenile Code of 1989, § 9-27-301 et seq.; or
(2) The subject of a child maltreatment investigation under the
Child Maltreatment Act, § 12-18-101 et seq.
(c) A record maintained by the Child Welfare Ombudsman Division that
pertains to a court case or investigation of a juvenile who is the subject of
work performed by the Child Welfare Ombudsman Division is confidential and
shall not be disclosed except as permitted under § 9-28-407.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code Title 25, Chapter 43, Subchapter 10, is
amended to add additional sections to read as follows:
25-43-1006. Division of Ombudsmen — Office of the Child Welfare
Ombudsman — Office of the Juvenile Ombudsman — Creation.
(a) There is created within the Department of Inspector General the
Division of Ombudsmen.
(b) There is created within the division the:
04/01/2025 3:00:22 PM LJH061

HB1964
(1) Office of the Child Welfare Ombudsman; and
(2) Office of the Juvenile Ombudsman.
(c)(1) There is created within the Office of the Child Welfare
Ombudsman the position of the Child Welfare Ombudsman.
(2) There is created within the Office of the Juvenile Ombudsman
the position of the Juvenile Ombudsman.
(d)(1) The Child Welfare Ombudsman and Juvenile Ombudsman shall report
to the Secretary of the Department of Inspector General.
(2) The Secretary of the Department of Inspector General shall
supervise the Child Welfare Ombudsman and the Juvenile Ombudsman.

25-43-1007. Office of the Child Welfare Ombudsman — Powers and duties.
(a) The Office of the Child Welfare Ombudsman shall:
(1) Work independently of the:
(A) Department of Human Services;
(B) Division of Arkansas State Police;
(C) Administrative Office of the Courts;
(D) Attorney Ad Litem Program;
(E) Commission for Parent Counsel;
(F) Arkansas Public Defender Commission; and
(G) Arkansas Court Appointed Special Advocates program;
(2) Review and recommend necessary changes to procedures under
the Arkansas Juvenile Code of 1989, § 9-27-301 et seq., the Child
Maltreatment Act, § 12-18-101 et seq., and other laws relevant to the
operation of the child welfare system that are applicable to the:
(A) Department of Human Services;
(B) Division of Arkansas State Police;
(C) Administrative Office of the Courts;
(D) Attorney Ad Litem Program;
(E) Commission for Parent Counsel;
(F) Arkansas Public Defender Commission; and
(G) Arkansas Court Appointed Special Advocates program;
(3) Review an issue or concern related to a court case or
investigation related to a juvenile if it appears that the juvenile, parent
of the juvenile, foster parent of the juvenile, relative of the juvenile, or
fictive kin of the juvenile may need assistance from the Child Welfare
04/01/2025 3:00:22 PM LJH061

HB1964
Ombudsman;
(4) Inform the public of the Office of the Child Welfare
Ombudsman and the contact information for the Office of the Child Welfare
Ombudsman; and
(5)(A) Prepare one (1) annual report per year concerning the
work of the Office of the Child Welfare Ombudsman, the operation of the child
welfare system, and any recommendations related to the operation of the child
welfare system.
(B) The Office of the Child Welfare Ombudsman shall submit
the annual report under subdivision (a)(5)(A) of this section to the:
(i) Governor;
(ii) House Committee on Aging, Children and Youth,
Legislative and Military Affairs;
(iii) Senate Interim Committee on Children and
Youth;
(iv) Secretary of the Department of Human Services;
(v) Director of the Division of Children and Family
Services;
(vi) Director of the Division of Arkansas State
Police;
(vii) Director of the Administrative Office of the
Courts;
(viii) Attorney Ad Litem Program;
(ix) Commission for Parent Counsel;
(x) Arkansas Public Defender Commission; and
(xi) Arkansas Court Appointed Special Advocates
program.
(C) The annual report under subdivision (a)(5)(A) of this
section shall not contain information that would identify a juvenile or the
family of a juvenile.
(b) The Office of the Child Welfare Ombudsman may:
(1) Communicate with a:
(A) Juvenile after the approval of, and subject to the
conditions set by, the:
(i) Dependency-neglect attorney ad litem appointed
to represent the juvenile; or
04/01/2025 3:00:22 PM LJH061

HB1964
(ii) Attorney for the juvenile if the juvenile has
an attorney other than a dependency-neglect attorney ad litem; and
(B) Parent of a juvenile after the approval of, and
subject to the conditions set by, the parent's attorney if the parent has an
attorney; and
(2) Access juvenile cases within the court system database of
the Administrative Office of the Courts to directly view all court-related
documents related to matters under review by the Child Welfare Ombudsman.

25-43-1008. Office of the Juvenile Ombudsman — Powers and duties.
(a) The Office of the Juvenile Ombudsman shall:
(1) Be subject to the same compliance with all procedures,
policies, and laws regarding the confidentiality of juveniles committed to
the Division of Youth Services as required by Division of Youth Services
employees;
(2)(A) Identify instances where necessary services are not being
provided with respect to the safety, health, education, and rehabilitation of
the juvenile as identified in a treatment plan.
(B) When a necessary service that is not provided is
identified under subdivision (a)(2)(A) of this section, the Juvenile
Ombudsman shall notify the Director of the Division of Youth Services or his
or her designee, the juvenile court having jurisdiction, the juvenile's
parents or guardian, and the juvenile's attorney or attorneys of the problem;
(3) Upon receipt of a complaint involving alleged child
maltreatment, immediately report the alleged incident to the Child Abuse
Hotline, the facility director, and the Director of the Division of Youth
Services or his or her designee, who shall be responsible for ensuring the
juvenile's safety;
(4)(A) Prepare one (1) annual report on the overall functioning
of the Division of Youth Services' ability to provide for the safety, health,
education, and rehabilitation of juveniles committed to the Division of Youth
Services and comparing the court's recommendations, the treatment plans of
the Division of Youth Services, and the actual services provided.
(B) The report shall be submitted to:
(i) The Governor;
(ii) The House Committee on Aging, Children and
04/01/2025 3:00:22 PM LJH061

HB1964
Youth, Legislative and Military Affairs;
(iii) The Senate Interim Committee on Children and
Youth;
(iv) The Secretary of the Department of Human
Services;
(v) The Director of the Division of Youth Services;
and
(vi) The judges of the juvenile divisions of circuit
court.
(5) The annual report under subdivision (a)(4)(A) of this
section shall not contain information that would identify a juvenile or the
family of a juvenile; and
(6) Ensure that the juvenile has unhampered access to a
grievance process that addresses the juvenile's questions, complaints, and
concerns in a timely manner in accordance with policy and procedure of the
Division of Youth Services or an applicable statute.
(b) The Office of the Juvenile Ombudsman may:
(1) Access:
(A) All tracking systems maintained by the Division of
Youth Services, including without limitation the:
(i) Incident report tracking system and the
disposition of incidents reported in the incident report tracking system;
(ii) Parent helpline tracking system; and
(iii) Juvenile tracking system;
(B) Any meeting or document that would be accessible to
the general public through the Freedom of Information Act of 1967, § 25-19-
101 et seq.;
(C) The juvenile's records and meetings of program
progress and case planning at all the privately contracted facilities of the
Division of Youth Services; and
(D) All records on the history and treatment of the
juvenile while in the custody of the Division of Youth Services or in
aftercare, including related agency and court records;
(2) Attend scheduled meetings or reviews of juvenile intake,
program progress, or aftercare planning;
(3) Accompany the monitor or monitoring team of the Division of
04/01/2025 3:00:22 PM LJH061

HB1964
Youth Services on any monitoring visit or audit of the Audit and Compliance
Section of the Division of Youth Services;
(4) Make unannounced visits to the unlicensed or unaccredited
facilities of the Division of Youth Services, whether state-run or privately
operated, to assure the safety and well-being of the juvenile;
(5) Initiate and maintain contact with a juvenile during the
juvenile's custodial placement or while on aftercare status;
(6) Access a juvenile for meetings of program progress and case
planning at all the privately contracted facilities of the Division of Youth
Services; and
(7) Document a juvenile's questions, complaints, and concerns
related to the juvenile's health, safety, education, and treatment and seek
answers to those questions and address any complaints and concerns in an
expedient manner.
(c) The Juvenile Ombudsman shall not have authority to:
(1) Command or otherwise instruct any Division of Youth Services
employee or contracted agent of the Division of Youth Services regarding any
aspect of programming or operations; or
(2) Alter or countermand any instruction to, or participation
by, juveniles that is consistent with the policy and procedure of the
Division of Youth Services or otherwise part of the treatment plan, program,
or operations associated with the agency.

SECTION 4. DO NOT CODIFY. Temporary language.
(a)(1) The Child Welfare Ombudsman Division previously located within
the Arkansas Child Abuse/Rape/Domestic Violence Commission and its authority,
duties, functions, records, contracts, personnel, property, and unexpected
balances of appropriations, funding, allocations, and other funds, including
without limitation the functions of budgeting or purchasing, are transferred
to the Department of Inspector General.
(2) The Child Welfare Ombudsman Division's statutory powers,
duties, and functions, including without limitation the functions of
budgeting or purchasing, records, contracts, personnel, property, and
unexpended balances of appropriations, funding, allocations, and other funds
are transferred to the Department of Inspector General.
(b)(1) The Juvenile Ombudsman Division previously located within the
04/01/2025 3:00:22 PM LJH061

HB1964
Arkansas Public Defender Commission and its authority, duties, functions,
records, contracts, personnel, property, and unexpected balances of
appropriations, funding, allocations, and other funds, including without
limitation the functions of budgeting or purchasing, are transferred to the
Department of Inspector General.
(2) The Juvenile Ombudsman Division's statutory powers, duties,
and functions, including without limitation the functions of budgeting or
purchasing, records, contracts, personnel, property, and unexpended balances
of appropriations, funding, allocations, and other funds are transferred to
the Department of Inspector General.

SECTION 5. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the
General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the Child Welfare Ombudsman
and Juvenile Ombudsman preserve the public peace, health, and safety by
protecting the rights of juveniles and the integrity of the child welfare and
juvenile justice systems of Arkansas; that this act provides for the transfer
of the Child Welfare Ombudsman Division and the Juvenile Ombudsman Division
to the Department of Inspector General; and that this act should become
effective on July 1, 2025, to coincide with the appropriation bills of the
Department of Inspector General and to ensure that the Child Welfare
Ombudsman and the Juvenile Ombudsman continue to provide their respective
vital services as the transfer is implemented and to not experience any
issues with funding under the transfer. Therefore, an emergency is declared
to exist, and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public
peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2025.











04/01/2025 3:00:22 PM LJH061